Tennessee, session 114, HB2403.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-530(j), is amended by adding
"speaker of the senate, speaker of the house of representatives," immediately after "civil justice
committee of the house of representatives".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2403
012617
- 1 -